Arkansas, session 2025, HB1950.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 88, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 6 — Prohibition of Discrimination Against Licensed Family
Childcare Homes

23-88-601. Purpose.
The purpose of this subchapter is to ensure that licensed family
childcare homes in Arkansas are protected from the termination or nonrenewal
of homeowners insurance based solely on their operation as licensed family
childcare homes.

*ANS281*
03/31/2025 7:43:20 PM ANS281

HB1950
23-88-602. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Homeowners insurance policy" means a type of property
insurance policy that provides financial protection against certain risks
associated with homeownership;
(2) "Licensed family childcare home" means a residence licensed
by the Department of Education to provide childcare services to a specified
number of children;
(3) "Personal liability insurance policy" means an insurance
policy that provides coverage for claims made against the insured for bodily
injury or property damage caused by the insured's negligence; and
(4) "Separate personal liability insurance policy" means an
insurance policy that provides a minimum coverage of one hundred thousand
dollars ($100,000) per occurrence specifically for liabilities arising from
operation of a licensed family childcare home.

23-88-603. Protection from insurance cancellations — Discrimination
against licensed family childcare homes prohibited — Minimum personal
liability insurance required.
(a) A homeowners insurance provider shall not:
(1) Cancel or refuse to renew a homeowners insurance policy of a
licensed family childcare home based solely on the operation of a licensed
family childcare home if the licensed family childcare home meets or exceeds
all applicable rules of the Department of Education; or
(2) Charge rates that exceed the rate amount of a homeowners
insurance policy with the same square footage or value.
(b) An operator of a licensed family childcare home shall maintain a
separate personal liability insurance policy with a minimum coverage amount
of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) per occurrence in addition to the
operator's homeowners insurance policy.
(c) A homeowners insurance provider shall provide:
(1) Written notice to a licensed family childcare home of any
reason for potential cancellation of the homeowners insurance policy or
nonrenewal of the homeowners insurance policy; and
(2) An opportunity for an operator of a licensed family
childcare home to remedy the situation that resulted in the potential
03/31/2025 7:43:20 PM ANS281

HB1950
cancellation of the homeowners insurance policy or nonrenewal of the
homeowners insurance policy that does not include ceasing operations of the
licensed family childcare home.

23-88-604. Responsibilities of operators of licensed family childcare
homes.
(a) An operator of a licensed family childcare home shall submit proof
of the operator's separate personal liability insurance policy to the
operator's homeowners insurance provider annually or upon renewal of the
operator's homeowners insurance policy.
(b) An operator of a licensed family childcare home shall comply with
all local and state rules and federal regulations regarding the operation of
a licensed family childcare home to remain eligible for the protections
described in this subchapter.

23-88-605. Enforcement.
(a)(1) The Department of Education shall enforce this subchapter.
(2) The Department of Education shall promulgate rules to
implement and administer this subchapter.
(b)(1) An operator of a licensed childcare facility may file a
complaint with the Department of Education if the operator believes the
operator's homeowners insurance provider has violated this subchapter.
(2) If an operator of a licensed childcare facility files a
complaint with the Department of Education under subdivision (b)(1) of this
section shall make a referral to the State Insurance Department.

23-88-606. Severability.
If any provision of this subchapter is found to be unconstitutional or
otherwise invalid, the remaining provisions shall continue in effect.







03/31/2025 7:43:20 PM ANS281